Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.130

Fraudulent registration—Financial liability.

Any person who shall for himself or herself, or on behalf of any other person, procure the registration of any trademark by the secretary of state under the provisions of this chapter, by knowingly making any false or fraudulent representation or declaration, or by any other fraudulent means, shall be liable to pay all damages sustained in consequence of such registration, to be recovered by or on behalf of the party injured thereby in any court of competent jurisdiction, together with costs of such action including reasonable attorneys' fees.

[ 2011 c 336 s 552; 1989 c 72 s 8; 1955 c 211 s 13.]